Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 13. Facilities for Detention and Other Residential Care.

§§ 16.1-310 through 16.1-314.
Repealed by Acts 1995, cc. 698 and 840.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, cc. 698 and 840, cl. 3 provides: “That this act shall become effective January 1, 1996, if state funds are provided to carry out the purposes of this act during the 1995 Session of the General Assembly.” These funds were provided pursuant to Acts 1995, c. 853, item 578.

§ 16.1-315.
Joint or regional citizen detention commissions authorized.

The governing bodies of three or more counties, cities or towns (hereinafter referred to as “political subdivisions”) may, by concurrent ordinances or resolutions, provide for the establishment of a joint or regional citizen juvenile detention home, group home or other residential care facility commission. Such commission shall be a public body corporate, with such powers as are set forth in this article.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-202.2; 1974, c. 645; 1977, c. 559.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Apportionment of costs of jointly elected sheriff for regional juvenile detention center. —

A city must abide by charter provisions pertaining to the apportionment of costs and expenses of a sheriff elected jointly with a county with regard to the funding of a regional juvenile detention center that is part of sheriff’s budget and may not authorize its share of the operational costs of the detention center to be determined separately from the county under a separate lease agreement. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Malfourd W. Trumbo, Member, Senate of Virginia, 01-009, 2001 Va. AG LEXIS 10 (2/22/01).

§ 16.1-316.
Number and terms of members; admission of additional local governing bodies.

A juvenile detention home, group home or other residential care facility commission shall consist of not less than three members and shall be comprised of at least one member from each participating political subdivision. In addition, the participating political subdivisions may provide for the appointment of an alternate for each principal member of such a commission. The alternate members may attend and participate in all meetings of the commission and may vote in the absence of their respective principals. Such members and alternates, if any, shall be appointed, after consultation with the chief judge of the juvenile and domestic relations district court, by the governing body. Neither the chief judge nor any judge of the juvenile and domestic relations district court from his district shall be a member of the commission.

The term of office of all members and alternates, if any, shall be for four years. When additional local governing bodies desire to join the commission, they may do so upon the recommendation of the commission and with the approval of the sponsoring local governing bodies. The number of members which the applicant local governments will be entitled to appoint to such commission and other conditions relating to the expansion of sponsoring membership shall be determined by the agreement entered into between or among the sponsoring local governments and such applicant local governments.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-202.3; 1966, c. 509; 1972, cc. 365, 430; 1974, c. 645; 1976, c. 448; 1977, c. 559; 1978, cc. 37, 717; 1984, c. 77; 1988, c. 885; 1992, c. 441; 1998, c. 488.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 1998 amendment,

in the first paragraph, added the second and third sentences, and inserted “and alternates, if any” in the fourth sentence, and inserted “and alternates, if any” in the first sentence of the second paragraph.

§ 16.1-317.
Quorum; chairman; rules of procedure; compensation.

The appointive members of the commission shall constitute the commission, and the powers of the commission shall be vested in and exercised by the members in office from time to time. Neither the chief judge nor any judge of the juvenile and domestic relations district court shall be a member of the commission.

A majority of the members in office shall constitute a quorum. The commission shall elect a chairman, and shall adopt rules and regulations for its own procedure and government. The governing bodies of the participating political subdivisions may by ordinance or resolution provide for the payment of compensation to the members of the commission and for the reimbursement of their actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-202.4; 1966, c. 509; 1977, c. 559; 1978, cc. 37, 717; 1988, c. 885; 1992, c. 441.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

§ 16.1-318.
Powers of commission generally; supervision by Director of Department of Juvenile Justice.

Each commission created hereunder shall have all powers necessary or convenient for carrying out the general purposes of this article, including the following powers in addition to others herein granted, and subject to such supervision by the Director of the Department of Juvenile Justice as is provided in §§

16.1-309.4

,

16.1-309.9

, and

16.1-309.10

of this law:

In general. — To adopt a seal and alter the same at pleasure; to have perpetual succession; and to make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers.

Officers, agents and employees. — To employ such technical experts, and such other officers, agents and employees as it may require, to fix their qualifications, duties and compensation and to remove such employees at pleasure.

Acquisition of property. — To acquire within the territorial limits of the political subdivisions for which it is formed, by purchase, lease, gift, or exercise of the right of eminent domain, subject to conditions hereinafter set forth, whatever lands, buildings and structures may be reasonably necessary for the purpose of establishing, constructing, enlarging, maintaining and operating one or more juvenile detention homes or facilities for the reception of juveniles committed thereto under the provisions of this chapter; however, such lands, buildings and structures may be acquired by purchase, lease or gift, although not within the territorial limits, if the location thereof is feasible and practicable with relation to the several political subdivisions for which such commission is formed. Such location shall be approved by resolution of the governing bodies of the participating political subdivisions and of the governing body of the political subdivision in which such lands, buildings and structures are to be located, and the consent in writing of the Director of the Department is given thereto.

Construction. — To acquire, establish, construct, enlarge, improve, maintain, equip and operate any juvenile detention home or facility.

Rules and regulations for management. — To make and enforce rules and regulations for the management and conduct of its business and affairs and for the use, maintenance and operation of its facilities and properties.

Acceptance of donations. — To accept gifts and grants from the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof, and from the United States and any of its agencies; and to accept donations of money, personal property or real estate, and take title thereto from any person, firm, corporation or association.

Regulations as to juveniles under care. — To make regulations and policies governing the care, guidance and training of juveniles in such detention facilities.

Borrowing. — To borrow money for any of its corporate purposes and to execute evidences of such indebtedness and to secure the same and to issue negotiable revenue bonds payable solely from funds pledged for that purpose and to provide for the payment of the same and for the rights of the holders thereof. Any city or county participating in the commission may lend, advance or give money or materials or property of any kind to the commission.

Issuance of revenue bonds. — To issue revenue bonds in accordance with, and subject to the terms and conditions of §

53.1-95.10

, in the same manner in which jail authorities are authorized to issue such bonds.Bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall not be deemed to constitute a pledge of the faith and credit of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision thereof. All such bonds shall contain a statement on their face substantially to the effect that neither the faith and credit of the Commonwealth nor the faith and credit of any county, city, town, or other subdivision of the Commonwealth is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such bonds. The issuance of bonds under the provisions of this section shall not directly, indirectly or contingently obligate the Commonwealth or any county, city, town, or other subdivision of the Commonwealth to levy any taxes whatever therefor or to make any appropriation for their payment except from the funds pledged under the provisions of this section. Any reimbursement payments made pursuant to §

16.1-309.5

for juvenile detention homes or facilities for which bonds are issued pursuant to this section shall not (i) exceed the maximum reimbursement limits established by the Board of Juvenile Justice or (ii) include any sums for the payment of interest costs incurred by the Commission in connection with the issuance of such bonds.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-202.5; 1964, Ex. Sess., c. 21; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1977, c. 559; 1989, c. 733; 1993, c. 833; 1995, cc. 696, 699; 1997, c. 752.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 833, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 1997, c. 642, cl. 1, effective March 21, 1997, as amended by Acts 1998, c. 893, cl. 1, as amended by Acts 1999, cc. 43 and 50, cl. 1, effective March 5, 1999, provides:

“That the provisions of this act shall apply only to (i) the Middle Peninsula Juvenile Detention Commission which serves the Ninth and the Fifteenth Judicial Districts, (ii) the W. W. Moore, Jr., Regional Juvenile Detention Commission which serves portions of the Tenth, Twenty-first, and Twenty-second Judicial Districts, (iii) the Rappahannock Juvenile Detention Commission which serves portions of the Fifteenth and Sixteenth Judicial Districts, (iv) the James River Juvenile Detention Commission which serves parts of the Eleventh, Fourteenth, and Sixteenth Judicial Districts, (v) the Blue Ridge Juvenile Detention Commission which serves parts of the Sixteenth Judicial District, (vi) the Highlands Juvenile Detention Commission which serves the Twenty-eighth Judicial District, (vii) the Roanoke Valley Detention Commission which serves parts of the Twenty-second, Twenty-third, and Twenty-fifth Judicial Districts, and (viii) the Crater Youth Care Commission which serves the Sixth and Eleventh Judicial Districts.”

Acts 1993, c. 833, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 1997, c. 752, cl. 2, and Acts 1998, c. 893, cl. 2, and Acts 1999, cc. 43 and 50, cl. 2, effective March 5, 1999, provides:

“That the provisions of this act shall apply only to (i) the Middle Peninsula Juvenile Detention Commission which serves the Ninth and the Fifteenth Judicial Districts, (ii) the W. W. Moore, Jr., Regional Juvenile Detention Commission which serves portions of the Tenth, Twenty-first, and Twenty-second Judicial Districts, (iii) the James River Juvenile Detention Commission which serves parts of the Eleventh, Fourteenth, and Sixteenth Judicial Districts, (iv) the Blue Ridge Juvenile Detention Commission which serves parts of the Sixteenth Judicial District, (v) the Highlands Juvenile Detention Commission which serves the Twenty-eighth Judicial District, (vi) the Roanoke Valley Detention Commission which serves parts of the Twenty-second, Twenty-third, and Twenty-fifth Judicial Districts and (vii) the Crater Youth Care Commission which serves the Sixth and Eleventh Judicial Districts.”

Acts 1995, c. 696, cl. 2 provides: “That this act shall become effective January 1, 1996, if state funds are provided to carry out the purposes of the Virginia Juvenile Community Crime Control Act during the 1995 Session of the General Assembly.” These funds were provided by Acts 1995, c. 853, item 578.

The 1995 amendments.

The 1995 amendments by cc. 696 and 699 are identical, and substituted “§§

16.1-309.4

,

16.1-309.9

, and

16.1-309.10

” for “§§

16.1-310

through 16.1-312” near the end of the introductory paragraph. For effective date, see the Editor’s note.

§ 16.1-319.
Acquisition of property by commission.

The commission shall have the right to acquire by eminent domain any real property, including fixtures and improvements, which it may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of this article, after the adoption by it of a resolution declaring that the acquisition of the property described therein is in the public interest and necessary for public use; provided, however, that no such real property shall be so acquired or such facility established within the territorial limits of such political subdivision without the approval, after public hearing, of the governing body of such political subdivision.

Subject to the provisions of §

25.1-102

, property already devoted to a public use may be acquired, provided, that no property belonging to any county or city, religious corporation, unincorporated church or charitable corporation may be acquired without its consent.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-202.6; 1977, c. 559; 2003, c. 940; 2006, c. 673.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 940 substituted “§

25.1-102

” for “§ 25-233” in the last paragraph.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 928 reenacted this section without change.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 673 substituted “religious corporation, unincorporated church or” for “or to any religious or” in the second paragraph.

§ 16.1-320.
Property of commission exempt from execution and judgment liens.

All property of the commission shall be exempt from levy and sale by virtue of an execution. No judgment against the commission shall be a charge or lien upon its property, real or personal.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-202.7; 1977, c. 559.

§ 16.1-321.
Appropriations by political subdivisions; issuance of bonds.

The political subdivisions for which the commission is created are authorized to make appropriations to the commission from available funds for the construction, improvement, maintenance and operation of any juvenile detention facility operated or proposed to be operated by the commission; and subject to other applicable provisions of law may issue general obligation bonds and appropriate the proceeds thereof for capital costs of such facility.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-202.8; 1977, c. 559.

§ 16.1-322.
Record of commission; reports.

The commission shall keep and preserve complete records of its administrative operations and transactions, which records shall be open to inspection by the participating political subdivisions at all times. It shall make reports to such subdivisions annually, and at such other times as they may require.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-202.9; 1977, c. 559.